Massachusetts, session 194th, S639.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 35WW of chapter 10 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 9 after the words “chapter 140” the 
following words:- “or other measures to improve animal health and welfare as the commissioner 
may determine, with majority support from the advisory committee established in chapter 193 of 
the acts of 2012”. 
SECTION 2. Section 35WW of chapter 10 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the figure “62”, in line 17, the following 
words:- , fines collected pursuant to section 37 of chapter 129 

of 2 9  SECTION 3.  Section 37 of chapter 129 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby 
amended by inserting after the fourth sentence the following sentence:- A fine assessed under 
this section shall be deposited into the Homeless Animal Prevention and Care Fund established 
in section 35WW of chapter 10.